Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-415
Manual for Courts-Martial, United States; applicability.

Insofar as it is not inconsistent with the provisions of this code, the Manual for Courts-Martial, United States, as established from time to time by Executive Order of the President of the United States shall be in force and effect and apply to the military forces of Nebraska.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 15, p. 1557.